Nebraska, session 109, LB33.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB33 LB33
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 53-103.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
53-103.02 (1) Alcoholic liquor includes alcohol, spirits, wine,
beer, and any liquid or solid, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine, or beer and capable of being consumed as a beverage by a
human being. Alcoholic liquor also includes confections or candy that
contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol.
(2) The Nebraska Liquor Control Act does not apply to (a) alcohol
used in the manufacture of denatured alcohol produced in accordance with
acts of Congress and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such
acts, (b) flavoring extracts, syrups, medicinal, mechanical, scientific,
culinary, or toilet preparations, or food products unfit for beverage
purposes, but the act applies to alcoholic liquor used in the
manufacture, preparation, or compounding of such products or confections
or candy that contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol, or (c)
wine intended for use and used by any church or religious organization
for sacramental purposes, or (d) nonalcoholic beer.
Sec. 2. Section 53-103.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-103.03 (1) Beer means a beverage obtained by alcoholic
fermentation of an infusion or concoction of barley or other grain, malt,
and hops in water and includes, but is not limited to, beer, ale, stout,
lager beer, porter, near beer, flavored malt beverage, and hard cider.
(2) Beer does not include nonalcoholic beer.
Sec. 3. Section 53-103.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-103.24 Nonalcoholic beer Near beer means beer containing less
than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume.
Sec. 4. Original sections 53-103.02, 53-103.03, and 53-103.24,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. The following section is outright repealed: Section
-2-

LB33 LB33
2025 2025
53-160.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-3-